Utah statutes.
48-1d-1307.   This part does not limit regulating board.

This part does not restrict the authority or duty of a regulating board to license an individual providing a professional service or the practice of the profession that is within the jurisdiction of the regulating board, notwithstanding that the individual:

(1)  is a partner or employee of a professional services partnership; or

(2)  provides the professional service or engages in the practice of the profession through a professional services partnership.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

